Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-1861] Fostering inspiration and
relevance through science and technology pre-academy program; established.
(a) There is established within the University of Hawaii, the fostering
inspiration and relevance through science and technology pre-academy program,
which shall be administered by the University of Hawaii college of
engineering. The mission of the fostering inspiration and relevance through
science and technology pre‑academy program shall be, with respect to
middle schools, to provide additional resources and expertise for the
department of education to stimulate the interest and achievement of students
in science, technology, engineering, and mathematics skills.

To achieve its mission, the fostering
inspiration and relevance through science and technology pre-academy program
shall house and provide direction for the robotics and problem-based, applied
learning program under section 304A-1862 and the research experiences for teachers
program under section 304A-1863.

(b) The goals of the pre-academy program shall
be to:

(1) Serve students between fourth and eighth grades,
with problem-based, applied learning experiences in science, technology,
engineering, and mathematics-related skills in a manner that complements the
academic program at public high schools; and

(2) Motivate and engage students in science,
technology, engineering, and mathematics programs.

(c) The pre-academy program shall encourage
partnerships with other relevant programs within the University of Hawaii
system, department of education, project EAST (environmental and spatial
technology) program, and appropriate public and private agencies, to establish
a program of problem-based, applied learning for elementary and middle school
students in science, technology, engineering, and mathematics disciplines.
School participation in the fostering inspiration and relevance through science
and technology pre-academy programs shall be voluntary.

(d) The fostering inspiration and relevance
through science and technology pre-academy program shall support development of
additional problem-based, applied learning projects and summer science,
technology, engineering, and mathematics programs for middle school teachers.
For additional problem-based, applied learning projects, priority shall be
determined in collaboration with participating teachers. Areas may include
global positioning system technology, ocean science, astronomy, earth science
and wireless communications technology, conservation biology, and other
science, technology, engineering, and mathematics skills-stimulating subjects
as appropriate.

(e) The fostering inspiration and relevance
through science and technology pre-academy program shall develop program
evaluation measures to ensure that all programs conducted under the pre‑academy
program are contributing to the advancement of science, technology,
engineering, and mathematics academics in the elementary and middle schools
through research. [L 2007, c 111, pt of §11]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next